Maine, session 132, LD1459.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3477, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2011, c. 291, §2 and c.
657, Pt. W, §5, is further amended by amending subparagraph (28) to read:
(28) A court-appointed guardian or conservator; or
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §3477, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2011, c. 291, §2 and c.
657, Pt. W, §5, is further amended by amending subparagraph (29) to read:
(29) A chair of a professional licensing board that has jurisdiction over mandated
reporters; or
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §3477, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2011, c. 291, §2 and c.
657, Pt. W, §5, is further amended by enacting a new subparagraph (30) to read:
(30) A municipal general assistance officer.
Sec. 4. 22 MRSA §4011-A, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2009, c. 211, Pt. B,
§18 and PL 2011, c. 657, Pt. W, §5, is further amended by amending subparagraph (31) to
read:
(31) A family or domestic violence victim advocate; and
Sec. 5. 22 MRSA §4011-A, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2009, c. 211, Pt. B,
§18 and PL 2011, c. 657, Pt. W, §5, is further amended by amending subparagraph (32) to
read:
(32) A school bus driver or school bus attendant; and
Sec. 6. 22 MRSA §4011-A, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2009, c. 211, Pt. B,
§18 and PL 2011, c. 657, Pt. W, §5, is further amended by enacting a new subparagraph
(33) to read:
(33) A municipal general assistance officer.